Maryland, session 2025, SB0155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–718.
(a) (1) In this section[, “eligible] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE long–term care premiums” means eligible long–term care
premiums within the meaning of § 213(d)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code for a long–term
care insurance contract covering an individual who is a Maryland resident.
(3) “TAXPAYER” MEANS A TAXPAYER WHO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0155*

SENATE BILL 155
(I) IS AT LEAST 85 YEARS OLD; AND
(II) IN THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH A CREDIT IS CLAIMED
UNDER THIS SECTION, HAS MARYLAND ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME OF LESS THAN:
1. $100,000 FOR A TAXPAYER FILING AS AN INDIVIDUAL;
OR
2. $200,000 FOR A TAXPAYER FILING A JOINT RETURN.
(b) [An individual] SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, A
TAXPAYER may claim a credit against the State income tax in an amount equal to 100% of
the eligible long–term care premiums paid by the [individual] TAXPAYER during the
taxable year for long–term care insurance covering the [individual] TAXPAYER or the
[individual’s] TAXPAYER’S spouse, parent, stepparent, child, or stepchild.
(c) The credit allowed under this section:
(1) [may not exceed $500 for] WITH RESPECT TO each insured
INDIVIDUAL covered by long–term care insurance for which the [individual] TAXPAYER
pays the premiums, MAY NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
(I) 15% OF THE ELIGIBLE LONG–TERM CARE PREMIUMS PAID
DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR; OR
(II) $1,500;
(2) may not be claimed by more than one taxpayer with respect to the same
insured individual; and
(3) may not be claimed with respect to an insured individual if[:
(i)] the insured individual was covered by long–term care insurance
PURCHASED at any time [before July 1, 2000; or
(ii) the credit has been claimed with respect to that insured
individual by any taxpayer for any prior taxable year] AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2004.
(d) (1) The total amount of the credit allowed under this section for any taxable
year may not exceed the State income tax for that taxable year, calculated before
application of the credits under this section and §§ 10–701 and 10–701.1 of this subtitle,
but after application of the other credits allowable under this subtitle.
(2) The unused amount of the credit for any taxable year may not be carried

SENATE BILL 155 3
over to any other taxable year.
(e) The credit allowed under this section does not affect the treatment under this
title of any deduction or exclusion allowed for federal income tax purposes for the eligible
long–term care premiums paid by the individual.
(f) On or before December 1, 2005, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Comptroller shall report to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the General Assembly, regarding the credit allowed under this section, including:
(1) the number of individuals who have claimed the credit, the amount
allowed as credits, and the additional number of individuals covered by long–term care
insurance as a result of the credit; and
(2) the savings under the State’s Medical Assistance Program as a result
of additional individuals being covered by long–term care insurance as a result of the credit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.